Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE Section 1. new text begin IRON ORE MINING ADDITIONAL UNEMPLOYMENT BENEFITS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Availability of additional benefits. new text end new text begin Additional unemployment benefits are available from the Minnesota unemployment insurance trust fund to an applicant who was laid off due to lack of work between March 15, 2025, and June 15, 2025, from: new text end new text begin (1) an employer in the iron ore mining industry that laid off 50 percent or more of the employer's workforce between March 15, 2025, and June 15, 2025; or new text end new text begin (2) an employer that is in the explosive manufacturing industry and providing goods or services to an employer in the iron ore mining industry, if the applicant was laid off due to the cessation or substantial reduction in operations of an employer in the iron ore mining industry as described in clause (1). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility requirements. new text end new text begin An applicant is eligible to receive additional unemployment benefits under this section for any week through the week ending June 19, 2026, if: new text end new text begin (1) the applicant established a benefit account under Minnesota Statutes, section 268.07, with 50 percent or greater of the wage credits from an employer as described in subdivision 1, and has exhausted the maximum amount of regular unemployment benefits available on that benefit account; and new text end new text begin (2) the applicant meets the same requirements that an applicant for regular unemployment benefits must meet under Minnesota Statutes, section 268.069, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Weekly and maximum amount of additional unemployment benefits. new text end new text begin (a) The weekly benefit amount of additional unemployment benefits is the same as the weekly benefit amount of regular unemployment benefits on the benefit account established in subdivision 2, clause (1). new text end new text begin (b) The maximum amount of additional unemployment benefits available to an applicant under this section is an amount equal to 26 weeks of payment at the applicant's weekly additional unemployment benefit amount. new text end new text begin (c) If an applicant qualifies for a new regular benefit account that meets the requirements of subdivision 4, paragraph (b), before the applicant has been paid additional unemployment benefits, and the new regular benefit account meets the requirements of subdivision 2, clause (1), the applicant's weekly additional unemployment benefit amount is equal to the weekly unemployment benefit amount on the applicant's new regular benefit account. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Qualifying for a new regular benefit account. new text end new text begin (a) If, after exhausting the maximum amount of regular unemployment benefits available as a result of the layoff under subdivision 1, an applicant qualifies for the new regular benefit account under Minnesota Statutes, section 268.07, the applicant must apply for and establish the new regular benefit account. new text end new text begin (b) If the applicant's weekly benefit amount under the new regular benefit account is equal to or higher than the applicant's weekly additional unemployment benefit amount, the applicant must request unemployment benefits under the new regular benefit account. An applicant is ineligible for additional unemployment benefits under this section until the applicant has exhausted the maximum amount of unemployment benefits available on the new regular benefit account. new text end new text begin (c) If the applicant's weekly unemployment benefit amount on the new regular benefit account is less than the applicant's weekly benefit amount of additional unemployment benefits, the applicant must request additional unemployment benefits. An applicant is ineligible for new regular unemployment benefits until the applicant has exhausted the maximum amount of additional unemployment benefits available under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Charging of benefits. new text end new text begin Additional unemployment benefits paid under this section may not be used to compute the future unemployment tax rate of a taxpaying employer and may not be charged to the reimbursing account of government or nonprofit employers. This exception does not apply to an employer described in subdivision 1, clause (1). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Eligibility for federal Trade Readjustment Allowance benefits. new text end new text begin An applicant who has applied and been determined eligible for federal Trade Readjustment Allowance benefits is not eligible for additional unemployment benefits under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from March 15, 2025. new text end ARTICLE 2 OTHER POLICY Section 1. new text begin [93.5141] SAFE STORAGE OF REACTIVE MINE WASTE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Goals. new text end new text begin Reactive mine waste must be mined, disposed of, and reclaimed to prevent the release of substances that result in adverse impacts on natural resources by meeting the applicable water quality standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicable water quality standards" means the federal, state, local, or Tribal water quality standards that directly govern the water into which a discharge occurs. new text end new text begin (c) "Reactive mine waste" means waste that is shown through characterization studies or other means to cause a sustained net decrease in pH of at least 0.5 standard pH units in contact water due to a chemical interaction between sulfur-bearing minerals and oxygen. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin A nonferrous metallic minerals mining operation must meet the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) chemical and physical characterization of mine waste must be conducted before an application for a permit to mine is submitted and continuously during the process of mining, according to Minnesota Rules, part 6132.1000; and new text end new text begin (2) to comply with applicable water quality standards during construction and at closure, a reactive mine waste storage facility must be designed by professional engineers who are registered in Minnesota and proficient in the design, construction, operation, and reclamation of facilities for storing reactive mine waste. The design may include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) modifying the physical or chemical characteristics of the mine waste or storing it in an environment where the discharge meets applicable water quality standards; or new text end new text begin (ii) during construction to the extent practicable and at closure, providing for collecting and disposing of waters that drain from the mine waste in compliance with applicable water quality standards. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [115.446] SITE-SPECIFIC WATER QUALITY STANDARDS FOR SULFATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "2017 statement of need and reasonableness" means the Pollution Control Agency's statement of need and reasonableness, Amendment of the sulfate water quality standard applicable to wild rice and identification of wild rice waters, Minnesota Rules, chapters 7050 and 7053 (July 2017). new text end new text begin (c) "Affected permittee" means a holder of or applicant for a national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit or state disposal system (SDS) permit from the Pollution Control Agency who discharges or proposes to discharge sulfate to a covered water that is the subject of a pending application for a site-specific sulfate standard. new text end new text begin (d) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency. new text end new text begin (e) "Covered water" means waters of the state: new text end new text begin (1) included in the 2017 statement of need and reasonableness, Attachment 2, compiled list of proposed wild rice waters; or new text end new text begin (2) identified as a wild rice water ([WR]) in Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0470, subpart 1. new text end new text begin (f) "Site-specific sulfate standard" means a site-specific modification, according to Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0220, subpart 7, of the 10 mg/L class 4A water quality standard for sulfates (SO4) under Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0224, subpart 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application completeness. new text end new text begin Upon receiving an application for a site-specific sulfate standard for a covered water, the commissioner must deem the application complete if the application includes: new text end new text begin (1) sufficient background information, including: new text end new text begin (i) details sufficient to identify the waters of the state or portion thereof for which a site-specific sulfate standard is sought, including the water identification number used by the commissioner for the covered water, the covered water's commonly used name, and the covered water's township, range, and section description; new text end new text begin (ii) the name, address, and telephone number of the person who prepared the application; and new text end new text begin (iii) a topographic map, or other map if a topographic map is unavailable, that shows the covered water and the area surrounding the covered water for a distance of at least one mile in all directions of the covered water; new text end new text begin (2) a proposed site-specific sulfate standard for the covered water calculated on the basis of reliable site-specific data using either: new text end new text begin (i) the equation proposed by the commissioner in the 2017 statement of need and reasonableness as Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0224, subpart 5, item B, subitem (1); or new text end new text begin (ii) the alternate approach proposed in the 2017 statement of need and reasonableness as Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0224, subpart 5, item B, subitem (2); and new text end new text begin (3) monitoring data for the covered water that: new text end new text begin (i) includes, for three of the last five calendar years preceding the application date: new text end new text begin (A) semiannual water quality sampling results for average sulfate concentration and average water depth in the covered water; and new text end new text begin (B) annual wild rice surveys that include data regarding the stand area, stalk density, and stem height of any naturally occurring wild rice in the covered water; and new text end new text begin (ii) demonstrates that the presence of wild rice when average sulfate concentrations in the covered water are at or below the proposed site-specific sulfate standard is not diminished from documented, historical wild rice presence. Any evaluation of naturally occurring wild rice in the covered water may account for external factors that influence wild rice growth, including but not limited to water depth, invasive species, wildlife predation, and weather events. If current sulfate levels are below the proposed site-specific sulfate standard, the permittee must agree to continue periodic monitoring of wild rice abundance. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Treatment of affected permittees. new text end new text begin (a) Upon receipt of a complete application for a site-specific sulfate standard, the commissioner, to the extent allowable under federal law, must: new text end new text begin (1) not deny the application unless and until the commissioner has completed the rulemaking described in Laws 2015, First Special Session chapter 4, article 4, section 136, paragraph (a); and new text end new text begin (2) exercise the commissioner's authority under federal and state laws and regulations to ensure, to the fullest extent possible, that no affected permittee is required to expend money to design and implement sulfate treatment technologies with respect to discharges to the covered water addressed in the application. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section prevents the commissioner from including in a schedule of compliance for any affected permittee a requirement: new text end new text begin (1) to monitor sulfate concentrations in discharges to the covered water addressed in the application; and new text end new text begin (2) if sulfate concentrations in discharges exceed the limit established by the site-specific sulfate standard, to implement a sulfate minimization plan to avoid or minimize sulfate concentrations during periods when wild rice in the covered water may be susceptible to damage. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Timeline for commissioner determination. new text end new text begin The commissioner must make a final determination on an application for a site-specific sulfate standard by the later of: new text end new text begin (1) 150 days after the commissioner receives a complete application for a site-specific sulfate standard; or new text end new text begin (2) 150 days after publication in the State Register of the notice of adoption for the rule described in Laws 2015, First Special Session chapter 4, article 4, section 136, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Completing rulemaking. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15, 2027, the commissioner must complete the rulemaking described in Laws 2015, First Special Session chapter 4, article 4, section 136, paragraph (a), according to the rulemaking procedures under chapter 14. new text end new text begin (b) Unless and until the commissioner completes the rulemaking described in paragraph (a), the commissioner must not deem any waters of the state to be designated as "water used for the production of wild rice" under Minnesota Rules, part 7050.0224, subpart 2, on the basis of natural beds of wild rice. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 6132.2200, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Rule: 25-05282 6132.2200 REACTIVE MINE WASTE. § Subpart 1. Goals. Reactive mine waste shall be mined, disposed of, and reclaimed to prevent the release of substances that result in the adverse impacts on natural resources. § Subp. 2. Requirements. A mining operation must meet the requirements in items A to D. § A. Chemical and physical characterization of mine waste must be conducted before the submission of an application for a permit to mine and continuously after that during the process of mining under part 6132.1000. § B. A reactive mine waste storage facility must be designed by professional engineers registered in Minnesota proficient in the design, construction, operation, and reclamation of facilities for the storage of reactive mine waste, to either: § (1) modify the physical or chemical characteristics of the mine waste, or store it in an environment, such that the waste is no longer reactive; or § (2) during construction to the extent practicable, and at closure, permanently prevent substantially all water from moving through or over the mine waste and provide for the collection and disposal of any remaining residual waters that drain from the mine waste in compliance with federal and state standards. § C. The reactive mine waste storage facility design shall: § (1) describe all materials, construction, and operating performance specifications and limitations that must be maintained to ensure protection of natural resources; § (2) identify monitoring locations to ensure compliance with the design; and § (3) include a schedule for inspection of the reactive mine waste storage facility construction, operation, and reclamation including closure and postclosure maintenance, by the design engineers, to ensure compliance with the design. In the event the design engineers become unable to perform the inspections, the engineers shall be replaced by persons who meet the qualifications of part 6132.2200, subpart 2, item B, and that can demonstrate an understanding of the design and an ability to perform the necessary inspections. § D. The commissioner may allow variance from specific reclamation requirements of parts 6132.2100 and 6132.2300 to 6132.2700 if their use would inhibit designs necessary to meet the requirements of this part.